Illinois, session 104th, HB1187.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Toll Highway Act is amended by changing 5Section 19 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 10/19)  (from Ch. 121, par. 100-19)7    Sec. 19. Toll rates. The Authority shall fix and revise 8from time to time, tolls or charges or rates for the privilege 9of using each of the toll highways constructed pursuant to 10this Act. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted at rates 11calculated to provide the lowest reasonable toll rates that 12will provide funds sufficient with other revenues of the 13Authority to pay, (a) the cost of the construction of a toll 14highway authorized by joint resolution of the General Assembly 15pursuant to Section 14.1 and the reconstruction, major repairs 16or improvements of toll highways, (b) the cost of maintaining, 17repairing, regulating and operating the toll highways 18including only the necessary expenses of the Authority, and 19(c) the principal of all bonds, interest thereon and all 20sinking fund requirements and other requirements provided by 21resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds as they 22shall become due. In fixing the toll rates pursuant to this 23Section 19 and Section 10(c) of this Act, the Authority shall   HB1187- 2 -LRB104 06169 LNS 16203 b1take into account the effect of the provisions of this Section 219 permitting the use of the toll highway system without 3payment of the covenants of the Authority contained in the 4resolutions and trust indentures authorizing the issuance of 5bonds of the Authority. No such provision permitting the use 6of the toll highway system without payment of tolls after the 7date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 8be applied in a manner that impairs the rights of bondholders 9pursuant to any resolution or trust indentures authorizing the 10issuance of bonds of the Authority. The use and disposition of 11any sinking or reserve fund shall be subject to such 12regulation as may be provided in the resolution or trust 13indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds. Subject to 14the provisions of any resolution or trust indenture 15authorizing the issuance of bonds any moneys in any such 16sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year's 17interest on the bonds then outstanding secured by such sinking 18fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All 19such bonds so redeemed or purchased shall forthwith be 20cancelled and shall not again be issued. No person shall be 21permitted to use any toll highway without paying the toll 22established under this Section except when on official Toll 23Highway Authority business which includes police and other 24emergency vehicles or an individual who is a veteran or active 25duty member of the United States Armed Forces. However, any 26law enforcement agency vehicle, fire department vehicle,   HB1187- 3 -LRB104 06169 LNS 16203 b1public or private ambulance service vehicle engaged in the 2performance of an emergency service or duty that necessitates 3the use of the toll highway system, or other emergency vehicle 4that is plainly marked shall not be required to pay a toll to 5use a toll highway. A law enforcement, fire protection, or 6emergency services officer driving a law enforcement, fire 7protection, emergency services agency vehicle, or public or 8private ambulance service vehicle engaging in the performance 9of emergency services or duties that is not plainly marked 10must present an Official Permit Card which the law 11enforcement, fire protection, or emergency services officer 12receives from his or her law enforcement, fire protection, 13emergency services agency, or public or private ambulance 14service in order to use a toll highway without paying the toll. 15A law enforcement, fire protection, emergency services agency, 16or public or private ambulance service engaging in the 17performance of emergency services or duties must apply to the 18Authority to receive a permit, and the Authority shall adopt 19rules for the issuance of a permit, that allows public or 20private ambulance service vehicles engaged in the performance 21of emergency services or duties that necessitate the use of 22the toll highway system and all law enforcement, fire 23protection, or emergency services agency vehicles of the law 24enforcement, fire protection, or emergency services agency to 25use any toll highway without paying the toll established under 26this Section. A veteran or active duty member of the United   HB1187- 4 -LRB104 06169 LNS 16203 b1States Armed Forces must display a military license plate as 2offered by the Secretary of State in order to use any toll 3highway in this State without paying the toll established 4under this Section. The Authority shall maintain in its office 5a list of all persons that are authorized to use any toll 6highway without charge when on official business of the 7Authority and such list shall be open to the public for 8inspection. In recognition of the unique role of public 9transportation in providing effective transportation in the 10Authority's service region, and to give effect to the 11exemption set forth in subsection (b) of Section 2.06 of the 12Regional Transportation Authority Act, the following vehicles 13may use any toll highway without paying the toll: (1) a vehicle 14owned or operated by the Suburban Bus Division of the Regional 15Transportation Authority that is being used to transport 16passengers for hire; and (2) any revenue vehicle that is owned 17or operated by a Mass Transit District created under Section 3 18of the Local Mass Transit District Act and running regular 19scheduled service. 20    Among other matters, this amendatory Act of 1990 is 21intended to clarify and confirm the prior intent of the 22General Assembly to allow toll revenues from the toll highway 23system to be used to pay a portion of the cost of the 24construction of the North-South Toll Highway authorized by 25Senate Joint Resolution 122 of the 83rd General Assembly in 261984.  HB1187- 5 -LRB104 06169 LNS 16203 b1(Source: P.A. 100-739, eff. 1-1-19.)